Nevada, session 83, AB501.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 389 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. The board of trustees of a school district or the governing
body of a charter school may authorize a pupil enrolled in junior
high or middle school or high school who completes an outdoor
recreational activity that is approved pursuant to subsection 2 to
receive credit toward the total number of credits required for
promotion to high school or graduation from high school, as
applicable. Any credit earned for completing an outdoor
recreational activity pursuant to this section must be applied
towards the pupil’s elective course credit.
2. The board of trustees of a school district or the governing
body of a charter school may approve for credit pursuant to
subsection 1 an outdoor recreational activity that:
(a) Is completed outside of school hours;
(b) Requires a pupil to spend a significant amount of time
outdoors; and
(c) Teaches the pupil skills that are relevant to outdoor
education which may include, without limitation:
(1) Identifying plants and animals native to this State;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
(2) Building trails;
(3) Restoring natural habitats;
(4) Outdoor survival skills;
(5) Outdoor recreational skills, including, without
limitation, hiking and archery; and
(6) Bird watching.
3. If the board of trustees of a school district or the governing
body of a charter school approves outdoor recreational activities
for credit pursuant to subsection 1, the board of trustees or
governing body, as applicable, shall prescribe the:
(a) Maximum amount of total credits that a pupil may earn for
completing outdoor recreational activities;
(b) Rules regarding how a pupil may apply for such credit
upon the completion of an approved outdoor recreational activity;
and
(c) Procedures for obtaining the consent of a parent or legal
guardian of a pupil before the pupil may participate in an outdoor
recreational activity for which credit will be granted.
4. This section shall not be construed to require the board of
trustees of a school district or the governing body of a charter
school to provide, facilitate or spend money to provide, facilitate or
sponsor any outdoor recreational activity.
Sec. 2. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)